Montana, session 2025, HB4.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Time limits. The appropriations contained in [section 2] are intended to provide necessary
expenditures for the years for which the appropriations are made. The unspent balance of an appropriation
reverts to the fund from which it was appropriated on conclusion of the final fiscal year for which its
expenditures are authorized by [section 2] and this section.
Section 2. Appropriations. The following money is appropriated, subject to the terms and conditions
of [section 1] and this section:
Agency and Program
JUDICIARY
Supreme Court Operations
Montana community justice workers Fiscal Year 2025 $290,750 Federal
Montana justice institute Fiscal Year 2025 $30,560 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into state fiscal year 2026:
- Montana justice institute
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
continue into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2023 adult treatment court
- Fiscal year 2024 adult treatment court
- Montana community justice workers
GOVERNOR'S OFFICE
Office of Budget and Program Planning
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into state fiscal year 2027:
- Local water and sewer infrastructure grants
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into federal fiscal year 2027 expires on [10 days after the effective date of this act]:
- 31 CFR, part 35
All remaining House Bill No. 632 appropriations of federal ARPA funds, excluding interest earned on
ARPA funds, are authorized to continue into state fiscal year 2027.
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into federal fiscal year 2027:
- American Rescue Plan Act's emergency assistance to non-public schools program
SECRETARY OF STATE
Business and Government Services
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Help America Vote Act Elections Security Grant
OFFICE OF PUBLIC INSTRUCTION
State Level Activities
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into state fiscal year 2026:
- Elementary and secondary schools emergency relief fund
- American Rescue Plan Act for homeless children and youth
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Farm-to-school grants
- Alternative student testing program
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Assessment for middle school science
DEPARTMENT OF JUSTICE
Legal Services Division
Johnson and Johnson Settlement Fiscal Year 2025 $3,537,516 State Special
All remaining fiscal year 2025 state budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Prescription drug prevention
- Johnson and Johnson settlement
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Upper Blackfoot mining complex operation and maintenance
Montana Highway Patrol
Law enforcement dispatch services for Montana patrol Fiscal Year 2025 $13,905 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into state fiscal year 2026:
- High intensity drug trafficking areas program
- Law enforcement dispatch services for Montana patrol
Division of Criminal Investigation
Missouri River drug task force high intensity drug trafficking area Fiscal Year 2025 $5,486
Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into state fiscal year 2026:
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
- High intensity drug trafficking areas program
- Russell Country drug task force high intensity drug trafficking area
- Internet crimes against children task force program
- State and local overtime reimbursements
- Missouri River drug task force high intensity drug trafficking area
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Billings office task force
- Fiscal year 2023 national sexual assault kit initiative
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Enhance state victim compensation payments
- Fiscal year 2024 support for Adam Walsh Act implementation
Board of Crime Control
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into federal fiscal year 2026:
- State crisis intervention program formula solicitation
Forensic Science Division
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Fiscal year 2023 national sexual assault kit initiative
- DNA capacity enhancement for backlog reduction program
- Fiscal year 2024 competitive DNA capacity enhancement for backlog reduction program
MONTANA ARTS COUNCIL
Promotion of the Arts
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into state fiscal year 2026:
- Promotion of the arts partnership agreements
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
LIBRARY COMMISSION
Statewide Library Resources
Managing current and comprehensive biodiversity information Fiscal Year 2025 $201,394
Federal
Biocultural restoration within the Crown of the Continent Fiscal Year 2025 $134,000
Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into state fiscal year 2026:
- Montana natural heritage program
- North American bat monitoring program
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Creating improved conservation planning through development, archiving, and distribution of
geographic information system in the state
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into state fiscal year 2027:
- Citizen botany program
All remaining fiscal year 2025 federal budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to
continue into federal fiscal year 2027:
- State library supplemental award
- Managing current and comprehensive biodiversity information
- Custer Gallatin National Forest raptor survey and monitoring
- Assessment of occurrence, range, and habitat of the northern long-eared bat and tricolored bat
- Northern long-eared bat presence, range, and distribution
- Biocultural restoration within the Crown of the Continent
MONTANA HISTORICAL SOCIETY
Administration Program
New Heritage Center Fiscal Year 2025 $600,000 Federal
- 5 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
Library & Archives
Upgrades to the mechanical system Fiscal Year 2025 $349,978 Federal
State Historic Preservation Office
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- Documenting Montana's Chinese American historic sites
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2027:
- Historic preservation fund grants
DEPARTMENT OF FISH, WILDLIFE, AND PARKS
Fisheries Division
Trout fishery evaluation for southwest Montana Fiscal Year 2025 $422,877 Federal
Western pearlshell genetic analysis Fiscal Year 2025 $128,933 Federal
Murray Springs Fish Hatchery Fiscal Year 2025 $367,876 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2027:
- Statewide fish habitat planning
- Western pearlshell genetic analysis
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Upper Missouri pallid sturgeon telemetry
- Trout fishery evaluation for southwest Montana
- Murray Springs fish hatchery
Wildlife Division
White Noise Syndrome Surveillance Fiscal Year 2025 $50,000 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- 6 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
- Forest legacy program administration funding
- Grizzly bear management assistance
- Kootenai River operational loss assessment
- White Noise Syndrome Surveillance
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Legacy administration
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2027:
- Cooperative weed management
- Evaluating habitat carnivore abundance and elk vital rates in Pilgrim Creek
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Game bird hunters' opportunity expansion
- Habitat conservation leases
- Northern continental divide ecosystem grizzly bear monitoring
- Large mammal monitoring in northwest Montana
- Adaptive management of bighorn sheep and mountain goats
- Marten monitoring study
- Evaluating contact risk between wild and domestic sheep
- Landscape connectivity
Parks and Outdoor Recreation Division
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- Ethnographic research and preliminary report
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2027:
- Smith River corridor management
- 7 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
Capital Outlay
Sportsman's Bridge FAS development Fiscal Year 2025 $738,057 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- Great outdoors conservation legacy project
- Sportsman's Bridge FAS development
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2027:
- Pre-preservation planning for Pictograph Cave state park
- Upper Thompson connectivity project
- Upper Thompson connectivity legacy project
- Montana great outdoors legacy project phase 2
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Habitat conservation leases
Communication and Education Division
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Preventing the introduction and spread of aquatic invasive species
Administration
Wildlife surveys on the Flathead Indian Reservation Fiscal Year 2025 $90,000
Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- Wildlife surveys on the Flathead Indian Reservation
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Landowner-led carnivore conflict reduction in western Montana
- 8 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
DEPARTMENT OF ENVIRONMENTAL QUALITY
Water Quality Division
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- Fiscal year 2023 water management planning supplemental grant
- Fiscal year 2021 nonpoint source project grant
- 2023-2025 106 monitoring initiative grant
- Fiscal year 2024 water quality management planning base grant
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Fiscal year 2025 water quality management planning base grant
- Water quality management planning supplemental grant
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2022 nonpoint source project grant
- 2024-2026 106 monitoring initiative grant
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2022 drinking water state revolving fund replacement grant
- Fiscal year 2023 Montana drinking water state revolving fund
- Fiscal year 2023 Montana clean water state revolving fund
- Fiscal year 2023 Montana clean water state revolving fund emerging contaminants grant
- Fiscal year 2023 nonpoint source project grant
- Fiscal year 2024 clean water state revolving fund supplemental grant
- Fiscal year 2024 drinking water revolving fund supplemental grant
- Fiscal year 2024 nonpoint source project grant
- Emerging contaminants in small or disadvantaged communities grant
- Sewer overflow and storm water reuse municipal grant program
- 9 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
Waste Management and Remediation Division
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- Fiscal year 2023 abandoned mine lands administration
- Upper Ten Mile Creek mining remedial action
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Fiscal year 2023 solid waste infrastructure for recycling
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2024 Montana abandoned mine land program
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2022 brownfields infrastructure investment and job acts
- Fiscal year 2023 bipartisan infrastructure law program for abandoned mine lands
- Infrastructure funding for additional coal work
- Brownfields assessment cooperative agreement
- Environmental services for housing project
Air, Energy, and Mining Division
Energy Efficiency Revolving Loan Fund Fiscal Year 2025 $5,114,180 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- Coal e-permitting
- Monitor national ambient air quality standards pollutants
- Statewide PM2.5 monitoring project
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2024 energy efficiency and conservation block grant program
- 10 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2023 bipartisan infrastructure law program
- Fiscal year 2024 bipartisan infrastructure law program
- Fiscal year 2024 air monitoring fenceline
- Fiscal year 2025 bipartisan infrastructure bill smart manufacturing
- Climate pollution reduction planning grant
- Operation and maintenance of water treatment facilities at Zortman and Landusky gold mines
- Air quality monitoring and trends analysis
- Bipartisan Infrastructure Law - preventing outages and enhancing the resilience of the electric
grid formula grants
- Energy Efficiency Revolving Loan Fund
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION
Highway and Engineering
Missouri River bridge replacement at Fort Benton Fiscal Year 2025 $23,007,055 Federal
US 93 Wildlife Crossing Pilot Program Fiscal Year 2025 $345,168 Federal
Russell Street Regional Connector Fiscal Year 2025 $53,480,511 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Kagy Boulevard reconstruction
- Reconnecting east Missoula
- US 93 North Ninepipe corridor reconstruction project
- Mineral County I-90 improvement project
- Federal-aid highway program obligation
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2022 rural surface transportation grant program
- Severe flooding in and around Yellowstone
- 11 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
- Rebuilding American infrastructure with sustainability and equity program
- Wildlife crossing pilot program
- Federal share for certain safety projects
- National significant federal lands and tribal projects
- Belgrade urban improvements
- Stone Creek north reconstruction project
- Gore Hill interchange reconstruction project
- I-90 Missoula to Garrison wildlife crossing feasibility study
- Sportsman's Bridge project
- Federal-aid highway program obligation
- US 93 North Ninepipe corridor reconstruction project
- Missouri River bridge replacement at Fort Benton
- US 93 Wildlife Crossing Pilot Program
- Russell Street Regional Connector
Motor Carrier Services Division
State mobility program Fiscal Year 2025 $8,983 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- State mobility program
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Fiscal year 2022 high-priority ITD grant program
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2023 high-priority ITD grant program
- Fiscal year 2024 high-priority ITD grant program
Aeronautics Program
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
- 12 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Airport improvement program
- Airport improvement program at Yellowstone airport
Rail, Transit, and Planning
US 93 Wildlife Crossing Pilot Program Fiscal Year 2025 $35,933 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Fiscal year 2023 areas of persistent poverty project
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- I-90 Missoula to Garrison wildlife crossing feasibility study
- US 93 Wildlife Crossing Pilot Program
Department of Livestock DEPARTMENT OF LIVESTOCK
Animal Health Division
Fiscal year 2025 highly pathogenic avian influenza in livestock Fiscal Year 2025 $3,090 Federal
2025 National Conference on Interstate Milk Shipments Fiscal Year 2025 $5,958 Federal
Veterinary Services Fiscal Year 2025 $24,804 Federal
Swine health improvement plan Fiscal Year 2025 $12,960 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- National animal disease preparedness and response program foreign animal disease outbreak
in African swine fever and foot and mouth disease
- Fiscal year 2024 farm bill funding program
- Fiscal year 2025 High pathology avian influenza dairy cattle personal protective equipment
- Fiscal year 2025 farm bill funding program
- 2025 milk training
- Fiscal year 2025 highly pathogenic avian influenza in livestock
- Swine health improvement plan
- 13 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES
Oil and Gas Conservation Division
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Underground injection control Class VI grant
Conservation and Resource Development Division
Low Tech Restoration Fort Peck Sage KI Fiscal Year 2025 $164,408 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- Fiscal year 2022 drinking water state revolving fund
- Fiscal year 2022 clean water revolving fund
- Fiscal year 2022 clean water state revolving fund grant
- Small and disadvantaged communities drinking water grant program
- Provide drinking water program assistance to underserved, small, and disadvantaged
communities
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Fiscal year 2022 drinking water state revolving fund grant
- 406 grazing academy
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2027:
- Small, underserved, and disadvantaged communities grant
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2022 clean water state revolving fund grant
- Fiscal year 2022 drinking water state revolving fund replacement grant
- Fiscal year 2022 drinking water state revolving fund emerging contaminants grant
- Fiscal year 2023 drinking water state revolving fund
- 14 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
- Fiscal year 2023 clean water state revolving fund supplemental grant
- Fiscal year 2023 drinking water state revolving funds emerging contaminants grant
- Fiscal year 2023 drinking water state revolving fund base grant
- Fiscal year 2023 clean water state revolving fund grant
- Fiscal year 2024 drinking water revolving fund emerging contaminants grant
- Fiscal year 2024 drinking water revolving fund supplemental cap grant
- Fiscal year 2024 drinking water state revolving fund base cap grant
- Fiscal year 2024 clean water state revolving fund supplemental capitalization grant
- Reducing stormwater and septic leachate toxic pollution in the headwaters of the Columbia
River basin
- Web application and support
- Prevent the spread of invasive species
- Rangeland resources
- Powerline removal restoration project
- Grassland partnership conservation effort
- Climate pollution reduction grants implementation grant
- Low Tech Restoration Fort Peck Sage KI
Water Resources Division
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- Fiscal year 2023 cooperating technical partners program
- Fiscal year 2024 fall national dam safety program
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Fiscal year 2022 cooperating technical partners program
- Fiscal year 2024 cooperating technical partners grant program
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- 15 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
- Fiscal year 2023 cooperating technical partners program
- Fiscal year 2024 cooperating technical partners program
Forest Trust Lands
Bipartisan Infrastructure Law Seedling Nursery Fiscal Year 2025 $250,000 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- Fiscal year 2021 consolidated forestry program grant
- Fiscal year 2022 consolidated forestry program grant
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2022 wood and biomass program administration
- Fiscal year 2022 bipartisan infrastructure law state forest action plans
- Fiscal year 2022 bipartisan infrastructure law state fire assistance
- Fiscal year 2022 bipartisan infrastructure law volunteer fire assistance
- Fiscal year 2022 consolidated forestry programs grant
- Joint chief—fire adapted Bitterroot
- Community wildfire assistance in the Clark-Fork face
- Marshall community forest and mountain park technical assistance
- Hazardous fuels reduction northern region and joint chief connecting fuels Salish Mountains
and Whitefish Range project treatment
- Bipartisan infrastructure law temporary bridge
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2023 bipartisan infrastructure law state forest action plans
- Fiscal year 2023 bipartisan infrastructure law state fire assistance
- Fiscal year 2023 bipartisan infrastructure law volunteer fire assistance
- Fiscal year 2023 Inflation Reduction Act urban and community forestry state allocations
- Fiscal year 2023 hazardous fuels reduction northern region
- 16 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
- Fiscal year 2023 consolidated forestry programs grant
- Fiscal year 2024 consolidated forestry program grant
- Fiscal year 2024 bipartisan infrastructure law state forest action plans
- Fiscal year 2024 bipartisan infrastructure law state fire assistance
- Fiscal year 2024 bipartisan infrastructure law volunteer fire assistance
- Restoration activities on the Beaverhead-Deerlodge National Forest
- Kootenai complex restoration projects
- Restoration activities on the Helena-Lewis and Clark National Forest
- Good neighbor authority capacity building
- Restoration activities on the Lolo National Forest
- Bipartisan infrastructure law community wildfire defense grants for Lincoln County
- Bipartisan infrastructure law community wildfire defense grants for Treasure County
- Bipartisan infrastructure law community wildfire defense grant for Blackfoot watershed
- Bipartisan infrastructure law community wildfire defense grant for north Gallatin front wildland
urban interface mitigation project
- Restoration activities on the Bitterroot National Forest
- Native seed network
- Bipartisan infrastructure law community wildfire defense grant comprehensive wildfire
protection plan update and modernization
- Bipartisan infrastructure law community wildfire defense grant base funding
- Fire-safe Flathead and Fire-safe Swan
- Prescribed fire assistance to the Flathead and Kootenai National Forests
- Increase plant materials for revegetation efforts at Yellowstone National Park
- Good neighbor agreement for the Lolo National Forest
- Good neighbor forest restoration services
- Good neighbor agreement for the Flathead National Forest
- Good neighbor agreement for east-side forests restoration
- Good neighbor projects Helena-Lewis and Clark National Forest
- 17 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
- Northern Rockies fire contract operations support
- Good neighbor agreement for the Bitterroot National Forest
- Prescribed fire assistance to the Custer Gallatin National Forest
- Prescribed fire assistance to Lolo National Forest
- Statewide good neighbor agreement prescribed fire support
- Nonfederal lands hazard mitigation
- Prescribed fire assistance to the Helena-Lewis and Clark National Forest
- Statewide good neighbor program
- Inflation Reduction Act forest landowner support
- Prescribed fire assistance to the Bitterroot National Forest
- Inflation Reduction Act urban and community forestry trees for indigenous nations
- Climate pollution reduction grants implementation grant
- Bipartisan Infrastructure Law Seedling Nursery
- Restoration activities on the Custer Gallatin National Forest
DEPARTMENT OF ADMINISTRATION
Architecture and Engineering Program
ConnectMT Digital Opportunity Program Fiscal Year 2025 $6,938,535 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Broadband equity, access, and deployment planning grant program
- State and local water and sewer infrastructure grants
- ConnectMT Digital Opportunity Program
DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE
Central Management Division
Certified Mediation Program Fiscal Year 2025 $814 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Fiscal year 2023 specialty crops block grant farm bill application
- 18 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2022 cooperative invasive plant cost share program
- Resilient food systems infrastructure cooperative agreement
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2023 bipartisan infrastructure law forest health invasive species
- Fiscal year 2024 invasive plant program cooperative cost share
- Fiscal year 2024 specialty crops block grant farm bill application
- Fiscal year 2024 invasive plant program cooperative cost share
- Northwest and Rocky Mountain regional food business center
- Bipartisan infrastructure law invasive species—EDRR project and capacity building
- Rural energy for America program technical assistance grant
Agricultural Sciences Division
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2022 cooperative invasive plant cost share program
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2023 bipartisan infrastructure law forest health invasive species
- Bipartisan infrastructure law invasive species—EDRR project and capacity building
- Bipartisan infrastructure law forest health invasive species western weed action plan
Agricultural Development Division
Certified Mediation Program Fiscal Year 2025 $11,935 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Fiscal year 2023 specialty crops block grant farm bill application
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
- 19 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
into state fiscal year 2027:
- Resilient food systems infrastructure cooperative agreement
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2024 specialty crops block grant farm bill application
- Northwest and Rocky Mountain regional food business center
- Rural energy for America program technical assistance grant
DEPARTMENT OF CORRECTIONS
Public Safety
Fiscal Year 2024 State criminal alien assistance program Fiscal Year 2025 $20,644
Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- Fiscal Year 2024 State criminal alien assistance program
Rehabilitation and Programs
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Small, rural school achievement program
- Connecting adults and minors through positive parenting
DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE
Business MT
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Creating and expanding export opportunities for Montana small businesses
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- State small business credit initiative
Brand MT
- 20 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- American Rescue Plan Act state travel, tourism, and outdoor recreation grant
Community MT
Pathways to removing obstacles to housing Fiscal Year 2025 $7,000,000 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2022 drinking water state revolving fund replacement grant
- Pathways to removing obstacles to housing
Housing MT
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- Fiscal year 2018 housing trust fund grant agreement
- Community development block grant
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2026:
- American Rescue Plan Act homeowner assistance fund
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- American Rescue Plan Act home investment partnerships program
- Section 811 project rental assistance demonstration
Director's Office
Southeastern Montana transmission siting and economic development Fiscal Year 2025
$47,459,092 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Southeastern Montana transmission siting and economic development
- Bipartisan infrastructure law - north plains connector interregional innovation
- 21 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND INDUSTRY
Workforce Services Division
Partners for reentry opportunities in workforce development Fiscal Year 2025 $943,097
Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2027 federal fiscal year 2026:
- National dislocated worker grants
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Partners for reentry opportunities in workforce development
- Maximus subcontract agreement
Unemployment Insurance Division
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- American Rescue Plan Act unemployment insurance integrity grant
Office of Community Services
AmeriCorps fixed amount grant Fiscal Year 2025 $1,377,306 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- AmeriCorps fixed amount grant
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- American Rescue Plan Act IT modernization grant
DEPARTMENT OF MILITARY AFFAIRS
Army National Guard Program
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- West-central Montana wildfire and vulnerability assessments
- 22 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
Disaster and Emergency Services
State and local cybersecurity grant program Fiscal Year 2025 $3,715,508 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2022 state and local cybersecurity grant program
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2023 state and local cybersecurity grant program
- Fiscal year 2024 nonprofit security grant program
- Fiscal year 2024 nonprofit security grant program
- State and local cybersecurity grant program
DEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC HEALTH AND HUMAN SERVICES
Human and Community Services
Emergency food assistance program Fiscal Year 2025 $30,000 Federal
Summer electronic benefit transfer program for children Fiscal Year 2025 $188,320
Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- Emergency food assistance program
- Summer electronic benefit transfer program for children
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Fiscal year 2025 low-income home energy assistance program
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2027:
- Infrastructure investment
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- 23 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
- Food stamp performance bonus
- Child nutrition discretionary grants
Child and Family Services
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Fiscal year 2023 adoption and legal guardianship incentive program
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Fiscal year 2024 adoption and legal guardianship incentive program
Director's Office
Refugee and entrant assistance state administered programs Fiscal Year 2025 $858,521
Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- Home and community-based services
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Fiscal year 2024 refugee support services
- Fiscal year 2025 refugee cash and medical assistance
- Refugee and entrant assistance state administered programs
Public Health and Safety Division
Strengthening public health infrastructure, workforce, and data systems in Montana Fiscal Year
2025 $135,950 Federal
Mpox crisis response Fiscal Year 2025 $1,339,555 Federal
Hospital preparedness program Fiscal Year 2025 $693,341 Federal
Preventing heart attacks and strokes Fiscal Year 2025 $51,738 Federal
Building capacity for Medicaid coverage and enrollment Fiscal Year 2025 $149,494
Federal
- 24 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
Development and training Fiscal Year 2025 $8,500 Federal
Partnership to promote local efforts to reduce environmental exposure Fiscal Year 2025
$71,426 Federal
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- Sexually transmitted disease prevention and control
- Data modernization core supplemental budget period 2
- Electronic death registration
- CDC's collaboration with academia to strengthen public health
- Strengthening public health infrastructure, workforce, and data systems in Montana
- Mpox crisis response
- Preventing heart attacks and strokes
- Building capacity for Medicaid coverage and enrollment
- Development and training
- Partnership to promote local efforts to reduce environmental exposure
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2027:
- Epidemiology and laboratory capacity for infectious disease advanced molecular detection
sequencing and analytics supplement
- Epidemiology and laboratory capacity for infectious disease strengthening health care-
associated infections and antimicrobial resistance program capacity supplement
- Epidemiology and laboratory capacity for infectious disease national wastewater surveillance
system
- Epidemiology and laboratory capacity for infectious disease laboratory data exchange
- Testing and contact tracing
- Testing, tracing, and mitigation
- Epidemiology and laboratory capacity for infectious disease enhancing detection expansion
- Epidemiology and laboratory capacity for prevention and control of emerging infectious
- 25 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
diseases
- Supporting clean air among priority populations in western Montana
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Cooperative agreement for emergency response: public health crisis response 2018
- Strengthening public health infrastructure, workforce, and data systems
- Strengthening public health infrastructure, workforce, and data systems
- Epidemiology and laboratory capacity for infectious disease strengthening health care-
associated infections and antimicrobial resistance program capacity supplemental
- Epidemiology and laboratory capacity for infectious disease advanced molecular detection
sequencing and analytics supplement
- Epidemiology and laboratory capacity for infectious disease national wastewater surveillance
system supplemental
- Epidemiology and laboratory capacity for infectious disease data modernization supplemental
- Strengthening public health infrastructure, workforce, and data systems modernizing
immunization information systems
- Strengthening public health infrastructure, workforce, and data systems supplemental budget
- Juul Labs settlement
Office of Inspector General
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- SNAP Integrity
Behavioral Health and Developmental Disability Division
Certified community behavioral health Clinic planning grant Fiscal Year 2025 $1,000,000
Federal
Montana partnerships for success Fiscal Year 2025 $312,500 Federal
988 Capacity improvement project Fiscal Year 2025 $222,506 Federal
Strengthening Families Initiative Fiscal Year 2025 $12,675 Federal
- 26 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- Certified Community Behavioral Health Clinic planning grant
- 988 Capacity improvement project
- Strengthening Families Initiative
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2027:
- Healing and ending addiction through recovery and treatment demonstration
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Transformation transfer initiative
Health Resources Division
Maternal and child health federal consolidated program Fiscal Year 2025 $117,814
Federal
Senior and Long-Term Care Division
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- Advancing the Montana lifespan respite coalition
- Adult protective services formula grants
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Community choice partnership
Early Childhood and Family Support Division
Sexual risk avoidance education Fiscal Year 2025 $46,229 Federal
Maternal and child health federal consolidated programs Fiscal Year 2025 $711,960
Federal
Women, infant and children modernization Fiscal Year 2025 $823,431 Federal
Act early ambassador to Montana stipend Fiscal Year 2025 $3,250 Federal
- 27 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into state fiscal year 2026:
- Preschool development grants birth through five
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2026:
- Maternal, infant, and early childhood home visiting grant program
- Child nutrition program training and technical assistance
- Sexual risk avoidance education
- Maternal and child health federal consolidated programs
All remaining fiscal year 2025 budget amendment authority for the following is authorized to continue
into federal fiscal year 2027:
- Technology implementation grant
- Women, infant and children modernization
Section 3. Transfer of funds. (1) By [10 days after the effective date of this act], the state treasurer
shall make the following transfers from the interest earnings on funds from the American Rescue Plan Act of
2021, Public Law 117-2, as provided in 31 CFR, part 35:
(a) $1,749,052 to the natural resources projects special revenue account established in 15-38-302
for projects in House Bill No. 7;
(b) $2,250,000 to the natural resources projects state special revenue account established in 15-
38-302 for water and wastewater projects identified in [section 1(4)] of House Bill No. 6;
(c) $224,500 to the natural resources projects state special revenue account established in 15-38-
302 for irrigation projects identified in [section 1(7)] of House Bill No. 6; and
(d) the remainder to the capital developments long-range building program account established in
17-7-209.
(2) On a quarterly basis, the state treasurer shall deposit all interest earnings on funds from the
American Rescue Plan Act of 2021, Public Law 117-2, as provided in 31 CFR, part 35, directly into the capital
developments long-range building program account established in 17-7-209 until December 30, 2026, by which
- 28 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

- 2025
69th Legislature 2025 HB 4
time American Rescue Plan Act funds must be expended or returned to the federal government and all interest
on funds ceases to accrue.
Section 4. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 29 - Authorized Print Version – HB 4
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 4, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 4
INTRODUCED BY L. JONES
BY REQUEST OF THE OFFICE OF BUDGET AND PROGRAM PLANNING
AN ACT APPROPRIATING MONEY THAT WOULD USUALLY BE APPROPRIATED BY BUDGET
AMENDMENT TO VARIOUS STATE AGENCIES FOR THE FISCAL YEAR ENDING JUNE 30, 2025;
PROVIDING THAT CERTAIN APPROPRIATIONS CONTINUE INTO STATE AND FEDERAL FISCAL YEARS
2026 AND 2027; PROVIDING FOR TRANSFERS OF FUNDS; AND PROVIDING AN IMMEDIATE EFFECTIVE
DATE.”